Maryland, session 2026, SB0162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
8–110.
(a) This section applies only to an individual who:
(1) (i) was convicted as an adult for an offense committed when the
individual was a minor[;
(ii) was sentenced for the offense before October 1, 2021]; and
[(iii)] (II) has been imprisoned for at least 20 years for the offense;
or
(2) (i) was convicted of an offense committed when the individual was
at least 18 years old but younger than 25 years old;
– 1 –

Ch. 498 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) was not sentenced to life without the possibility of parole;
(iii) is not a sex offender, as defined in § 11–701 of this article;
(iv) has been imprisoned for at least 20 years for the offense; and
(v) was not convicted of murder involving a victim who was a first
responder, as defined in § 18–213.2 of the Health – General Article, who was killed in the
line of duty.
(b) (1) An individual described in subsection (a) of this section may file a
motion with the court to reduce the duration of the sentence.
(2) A court shall conduct a hearing on a motion to reduce the duration of a
sentence.
(3) (i) The individual shall be present at the hearing, unless the
individual waives the right to be present.
(ii) The requirement that the individual be present at the hearing is
satisfied if the hearing is conducted by video conference.
(4) (i) The individual may introduce evidence in support of the motion
at the hearing.
(ii) The State may introduce evidence in support of or in opposition
to the motion at the hearing.
(5) (i) Notice of the hearing under this subsection shall be given to the
victim or the victim’s representative as provided in §§ 11–104 and 11–503 of this article.
(ii) A victim or victim’s representative may submit a victim impact
statement to the court regarding the impact of the crime and the proposed sentence
reduction.
(iii) A victim may not be cross–examined when presenting a victim
impact statement under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –